Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 3. Powers

§ 2601.
Generally.

A fire district may vote to adopt the town manager system in compliance with 24 V.S.A. chapter 37.
It may vote a tax upon the taxable estate for the protection of property in the district from damage by fire; for the acquisition, construction, and maintenance of sewers and sewage treatment works; sidewalks; public parks; water works, water companies, and equipment and real estate used in connection therewith, including reservoirs and dams; for lighting; and for other lawful purposes.
The prudential committee and collector shall have the same power in assessing, levying, and collecting the tax, as town officers have in assessing and collecting town taxes, including the collection of interest on overdue taxes. The prudential committee may expend such sums for acquiring, constructing, and maintaining sewers and sewage treatment works; sidewalks; public parks; water works, water companies, and all equipment and real estate used in connection therewith, including reservoirs and dams; and for lighting purposes as the fire district may vote.
The committee may use and occupy such portions of the highways within the district as may be necessary for constructing and maintaining sewers and sewage treatment works; sidewalks; public parks; water works and mains, and for lighting purposes.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 31, 1970;

1981, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 1982.

§ 2602.
Matters subject to regulation by bylaws.

A fire district at its meetings may regulate by bylaws the manufacture and safekeeping of ashes, gunpowder, and combustibles, and the preservation of buildings from fire by precautionary measures and by inspection.

§ 2603.
Sprinkling and oiling streets.

If it so votes at its annual meeting, a fire district may empower its prudential committee to cause the streets of such district to be sprinkled or oiled to the extent deemed necessary by the committee.

§ 2604.
Preservation of property.

In the name of the district, the prudential committee may make contracts and expenditures for the preservation of property in the district from damage by fire as they deem necessary and draw orders on the treasury for that purpose. However, the committee shall not bind the district for a greater sum than has been voted.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 166.

§ 2605.
Purchase of property.

A fire district, through its prudential committee, may purchase and hold, in addition to the apparatus for extinguishing fires, such real and personal estate as is necessary for the preservation of the fire apparatus.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 17

.

§ 2606.
Eminent domain.

When a fire district decides to erect a building for the preservation of its fire apparatus and the location of land for the building is determined, if the owner of the land refuses to convey the land to the district at a price that the district deems reasonable, the district may take the land in the same manner as a town may take land for town purposes as provided in

24 V.S.A. §§ 2805-2812

. The duties imposed by

24 V.S.A. §§ 2805-2812

upon the selectboard shall be performed by the prudential committee of the district. All petitions and notices shall be served on the clerk of the district in lieu of on the town clerk as provided pursuant to 24 V.S.A. §§ 2805-2812.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 167.

§ 2607.
Actions and claims.

The committee may commence and prosecute actions in the name of the district, defend and adjust actions commenced against it, and settle claims in favor of and against the district.